Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1575
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-1575 to 2-1585 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Act.

Laws 1977, LB 450, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 236, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 26;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 619, § 1.